Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201944-2418
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-2401 to 44-2419 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act.

Laws 1971, LB 722, § 18;

Laws 1974, LB 1014, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB380, § 9.